Idaho, session 2025, H0341.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Educa-
tion the following amounts to be expended according to the designated pro-
grams and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH & EXTENSION SERVICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $35,213,000 $3,842,400 $650,000 $39,705,400
II. COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES:
A. BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $121,885,700 $9,523,500 $3,441,400 $134,850,600
Unrestricted
Fund 120,067,500 50,427,100 0 170,494,600
TOTAL $241,953,200 $59,950,600 $3,441,400 $305,345,200
B. IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $100,267,100 $2,320,000 $102,587,100
Charitable Institutions Endowment Income
Fund 1,990,400 1,990,400
Normal School Endowment Income
Fund 3,813,700 3,813,700
Unrestricted
Fund 37,544,400 24,175,700 $4,074,800 65,794,900
TOTAL $143,615,600 $26,495,700 $4,074,800 $174,186,100
C. LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $20,473,900 $2,602,200 $425,300 $23,501,400
Normal School Endowment Income
Fund 3,636,600 3,636,600
Unrestricted
Fund 14,277,600 2,118,400 23,800 16,419,800
TOTAL $34,751,500 $8,357,200 $449,100 $43,557,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $103,921,000 $6,989,900 $3,491,500 $114,402,400
Agricultural College Endowment Income
Fund 940,100 806,200 246,900 1,993,200
Scientific School Endowment Income
Fund 3,468,500 3,253,900 6,722,400
University Endowment Income
Fund 5,465,800 680,600 6,146,400
Unrestricted
Fund 60,543,400 16,847,400 57,600 77,448,400
TOTAL $168,873,000 $33,363,200 $4,476,600 $206,712,800
E. SYSTEMWIDE PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $270,700 $2,168,500 $4,019,000 $6,458,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $589,464,000 $130,335,200 $12,441,900 $4,019,000 $736,260,100
III. COMMUNITY COLLEGES:
A. COLLEGE OF EASTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,821,800 $7,821,800
Community College
Fund 200,000 200,000
TOTAL $8,021,800 $8,021,800
B. COLLEGE OF SOUTHERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $18,190,100 $2,310,900 $20,501,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Community College
Fund 0 200,000 200,000
TOTAL $18,190,100 $2,510,900 $20,701,000
C. COLLEGE OF WESTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $19,182,100 $3,012,600 $22,194,700
Community College
Fund 0 200,000 200,000
TOTAL $19,182,100 $3,212,600 $22,394,700
D. NORTH IDAHO COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $14,016,400 $2,166,800 $16,183,200
Community College
Fund 0 175,000 $25,000 200,000
TOTAL $14,016,400 $2,341,800 $25,000 $16,383,200
E. CC SYSTEMWIDE:
FROM:
General
Fund $39,200 $39,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $59,410,400 $8,104,500 $25,000 $67,539,900
IV. OFFICE OF THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION:
A. OSBE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,680,600 $3,264,300 $29,150,000 $38,094,900
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 40,900 83,900 124,800
In-Demand Careers
Fund 276,400 12,000 288,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 174,100 160,000 $6,125,000 100,000 6,559,100
Federal Grant
Fund 170,200 340,300 0 0 510,500
TOTAL $6,342,200 $3,860,500 $6,125,000 $29,250,000 $45,577,700
B. IT AND DATA MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,378,800 $1,073,500 $3,430,000 $7,882,300
Broadband Infrastructure
Fund 1,274,000 1,274,000
Public Instruction
Fund 0 15,000 0 15,000
TOTAL $3,378,800 $1,088,500 $4,704,000 $9,171,300
C. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $583,700 $151,200 $734,900
Miscellaneous Revenue/ School Security Assessment
Fund 296,200 53,500 349,700
Federal Grant
Fund 219,600 40,900 260,500
TOTAL $1,099,500 $245,600 $1,345,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $10,820,500 $5,194,600 $6,125,000 $33,954,000 $56,094,100
V. HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS:
A. BOISE INTERNAL MEDICINE:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,231,000 $1,231,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. EASTERN IDAHO MED RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,005,000 $3,005,000
C. FAMILY MEDICINE RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,848,100 $321,600 $4,460,000 $7,629,700
D. IDAHO DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $304,200 $1,720,400 $2,024,600
Unrestricted
Fund 253,200 $25,800 $5,500 0 284,500
TOTAL $557,400 $25,800 $5,500 $1,720,400 $2,309,100
E. PSYCHIATRY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $837,800 $837,800
F. UNIVERSITY OF UTAH MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,110,600 $3,110,600
G. WIMU VETERINARY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $728,000 $2,103,500 $2,831,500
Restricted
Fund 0 0 $100,000 100,000
TOTAL $728,000 $2,103,500 $100,000 $2,931,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
H. WWAMI MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,949,400 $447,800 $5,397,600 $7,794,800
DIVISION
TOTAL $6,082,900 $2,898,700 $5,500 $19,862,400 $28,849,500
VI. DIVISION OF CAREER TECHNICAL EDUCATION:
A. CTE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,342,400 $682,600 $3,025,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 20,000 20,000
TOTAL $2,342,400 $702,600 $3,045,000
B. SECONDARY AND GENERAL PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,272,500 $239,200 $15,033,000 $16,544,700
In-Demand Careers
Fund 5,000,000 5,000,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 25,000 25,000
Federal Grant
Fund 816,600 277,800 2,985,400 4,079,800
TOTAL $2,089,100 $542,000 $23,018,400 $25,649,500
C. POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $51,846,400 $5,200,300 $57,046,700
Federal Grant
Fund 0 0 $2,685,500 2,685,500
TOTAL $51,846,400 $5,200,300 $2,685,500 $59,732,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. EDUCATOR SERVICES PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,149,200 $234,100 $702,500 $2,085,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 275,000 0 275,000
TOTAL $1,149,200 $509,100 $702,500 $2,360,800
E. RELATED PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $930,600 $193,300 $2,090,000 $3,213,900
Displaced Homemaker
Fund 170,000 170,000
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 67,800 67,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 15,000 15,000
Federal Grant
Fund 245,600 69,800 2,862,000 3,177,400
TOTAL $1,176,200 $278,100 $5,189,800 $6,644,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $58,603,300 $7,232,100 $31,596,200 $97,431,600
VII. IDAHO PUBLIC TELEVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,680,900 $1,061,400 $341,900 $3,084,200
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 155,100 850,000 0 1,005,100
TOTAL $1,836,000 $1,911,400 $341,900 $4,089,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VIII. SPECIAL PROGRAMS:
A. FOREST UTILIZATION RESEARCH:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,549,900 $170,400 $1,720,300
B. GEOLOGICAL SURVEY:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,360,900 $38,700 $1,399,600
C. MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY:
FROM:
General
Fund $765,800 $24,800 $790,600
D. SCHOLARSHIPS AND GRANTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $112,100 $24,913,300 $25,025,400
US Dept of Education Gearup Scholarship
Fund 25,100 $1,000 4,504,600 4,530,700
TOTAL $137,200 $1,000 $29,417,900 $29,556,100
E. SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $935,000 $935,000
American Rescue Plan
Fund 112,700 $110,200 222,900
TOTAL $1,047,700 $110,200 $1,157,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
F. TECHHELP:
FROM:
General
Fund $461,100 $461,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $5,322,600 $345,100 $29,417,900 $35,085,600
IX. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,966,700 $867,900 $3,834,600
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 827,300 157,800 985,100
Public Instruction
Fund 594,500 231,600 826,100
Federal Grant
Fund 0 96,000 96,000
TOTAL $4,388,500 $1,353,300 $5,741,800
B. STUDENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,258,500 $3,876,900 $774,100 $7,909,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 114,400 902,900 1,017,300
Driver's Training
Fund 220,100 302,900 2,113,300 2,636,300
Public Instruction
Fund 399,300 766,200 11,400 1,176,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 381,800 187,700 569,500
Public Schools Other Income
Fund 118,500 363,100 481,600
Cigarette, Tobacco and Lottery Income Taxes
Fund 119,000 119,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 53,500 2,950,000 3,003,500
Federal Grant
Fund 5,322,800 12,192,400 2,082,200 19,597,400
TOTAL $9,987,900 $18,592,100 $7,931,000 $36,511,000
DIVISION
TOTAL $14,376,400 $19,945,400 $7,931,000 $42,252,800
X. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
A. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,648,400 $330,700 $55,500 $1,797,400 $4,832,000
Rehabilitation Revenue and Refunds
Fund 79,700 541,500 540,000 1,161,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 89,400 165,700 255,100
Federal Grant
Fund 10,410,900 1,619,100 349,100 7,729,700 20,108,800
TOTAL $13,228,400 $2,491,300 $404,600 $10,232,800 $26,357,100
B. COUNCIL FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING:
FROM:
General
Fund $484,900 $100,700 $585,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 3,000 3,000
TOTAL $484,900 $103,700 $588,600
DIVISION
TOTAL $13,713,300 $2,595,000 $404,600 $10,232,800 $26,945,700
XI. CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $152,300 $47,600 $199,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Public Charter School Authorizers
Fund 439,100 103,400 542,500
TOTAL $591,400 $151,000 $742,400
DIVISION
TOTAL $591,400 $151,000 $742,400
GRANDTOTAL $795,433,800 $182,555,400 $19,993,900 $137,013,300 $1,134,996,400
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, the programs listed below in State Board of Education are autho-
rized no more than the following number of full-time equivalent positions
at any point during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, unless
specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropria-
tions Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so
authorized. Full-time equivalent positions at the institutions of higher
education and postsecondary programs in the Division of Career Technical
Education are not limited.
Office of the State Board of Education ..........................84.25
WIMU Veterinary Education ......................................6.38
WWAMI Medical Education .......................................13.72
Idaho Dental Education Programs ................................3.25
Family Medicine Residencies ...................................23.30
Division of Career Technical Education .........................60.00
Idaho Public Television .......................................15.00
Forest Utilization Research ...................................13.28
Geological Survey ............................................12.47
Museum of Natural History ......................................8.20
Scholarships and Grants ........................................1.35
Small Business Development Centers ............................11.33
TechHelp ......................................................3.44
Department of Education ......................................126.00
Division of Vocational Rehabilitation ........................148.00
Charter School Commission ......................................5.00
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The
State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho
for the Agricultural Research and Extension Service are hereby exempted from
the provisions of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited
transfers between expense classes for all moneys appropriated to them for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations
shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly ap-
proved by the Legislature.


SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board of Re-
gents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the Office
of the State Board of Education any unexpended and unencumbered balances
appropriated or reappropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities from
dedicated funds for fiscal year 2025, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the
State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense
class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing
the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS. The State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the Univer-
sity of Idaho for College and Universities and the Office of the State Board
of Education are hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1),
(2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense
classes and between programs for all moneys appropriated to them for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations shall
not be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved
by the Legislature.
SECTION 6. SYSTEMWIDE NEEDS. Of the amount appropriated in Subsection
II. E. of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts may be used as follows:
(1) An amount not to exceed $902,600 may be used by the Office of
the State Board of Education for systemwide needs that benefit all of the
four-year institutions, including but not limited to projects to promote
accountability and information transfer throughout the higher education
system; and
(2) An amount of approximately $1,960,500 may be used for the mission
and goals of the Higher Education Research Council as outlined in State
Board of Education Policy III.W., which includes awards for infrastructure,
matching grants, and competitive grants through the Idaho Incubation Fund
program.
SECTION 7. STUDENT TUITION AND FEES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 -- COLLEGE AND
UNIVERSITIES. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-3516(2), Idaho
Code, the Division of Financial Management may approve the expenditure of
dedicated state funds pursuant to the noncognizable process for student tu-
ition and fees during fiscal year 2026 for College and Universities. Each of
the institutions' budget requests for fiscal year 2027 shall reflect all ad-
justments so approved by the Division of Financial Management.
SECTION 8. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIM-
ITATIONS. The State Board of Education for Community Colleges is hereby
exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1), (2), and (3), Idaho
Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes and between pro-
grams for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,2025, through
June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one
fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.


SECTION 9. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The
State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho
for Health Education Programs are hereby exempted from the provisions of
Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers be-
tween expense classes for dedicated fund moneys appropriated for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations shall not be
transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 10. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS. There
is hereby reappropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board of
Regents of the University of Idaho for Health Education Programs any un-
expended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho
for Health Education Programs from dedicated funds for fiscal year 2025 to
be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappro-
priation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative
Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 11. STUDENT TUITION AND FEES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 -- HEALTH
EDUCATION PROGRAMS. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-3516(2),
Idaho Code, the Division of Financial Management may approve the expenditure
of dedicated state funds pursuant to the noncognizable process for student
tuition and fees during fiscal year 2026 for Health Education Programs. Each
of the programs' budget requests for fiscal year 2027 shall reflect all ad-
justments so approved by the Division of Financial Management.
SECTION 12. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. Post-
secondary Programs within the Division of Career Technical Education is
hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho
Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes for all moneys
appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Leg-
islative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another
fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 13. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION. Idaho Public Television is
hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for positions and funds
from its Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026, for the purpose of content production and related services from
revenue sources provided by private donations.
SECTION 14. OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ACCOUNT. Moneys appropri-
ated from the General Fund to the Scholarships and Grants Program for fiscal
year 2025 that are unexpended and unencumbered on June 30, 2025, are hereby
appropriated and shall be transferred by the Office of the State Controller
to the Opportunity Scholarship Program Account created in Section 33-4303,
Idaho Code.


SECTION 15. ACQUISITIONS. Consistent with the provisions of Chapter
92, Title 67, Idaho Code, the State Department of Education is encouraged
to engage in open, competitive acquisition processes. The State Department
of Education shall provide a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations
Committee by December 1, 2025, on all contracts signed during fiscal year
2025 for property valued at more than $25,000. The report shall include
for each contract: (a) the amount; (b) the duration; (c) the parties; (d)
the subject; (e) whether the contract was awarded as a result of an open,
competitive acquisition process or a sole source or other noncompetitive
procurement pursuant to Section 67-9221, Idaho Code; and (f) the rationale
for signing any sole source or other noncompetitive procurements.
SECTION 16. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO MILLENNIUM INCOME
FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the State Department of Education
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the State Department of Education from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund for
fiscal year 2025 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.
SECTION 17. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO CAREER READY STU-
DENTS FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the State Department of Edu-
cation any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropri-
ated to the State Department of Education from the Idaho Career Ready Stu-
dents Fund for fiscal year 2025, in an amount not to exceed $39,000,000 from
the Idaho Career Ready Students Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures related to the Idaho Career Ready Students Program for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.
SECTION 18. STANDARDS REVIEW AND ADOPTION PROGRAMS. Notwithstanding
the provisions of Section 49-308, Idaho Code, and any other provision of law
to the contrary, of the amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this act and any
other appropriation provided by law from the Driver's Training Fund, no more
than $150,000 shall be used for standards review and adoption programs.
SECTION 19. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.


SECTION 20. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 21. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.